Tennessee, session 114, HB1090.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-6-106, is amended by adding the
following language to the end of the section:
The commissioner must file the report by February 1 of each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1090
002844
- 1 -